Mississippi, session 2026, HB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning for the purpose of providing funding for the repair, restoration, improvements and maintenance of campus facilities at the three (3) Historically Black Colleges and Universities (HBCUs) in Mississippi, Alcorn State University, Jackson State University and Mississippi Valley State University, as provided in Section 2 of this act, for the period beginning upon the passage of this act and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. ................................................ $300,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be allocated in equal amounts of One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) to each university, which shall be used specifically for the following purposes: (a)  Renovation and restoration of historic buildings and campus structures; (b)  Upgrades to campus infrastructure, including electrical, plumbing and HVAC systems; (c)  Improvements to student housing facilities; (d)  Development of modern academic spaces and laboratories; (e)  Enhancement of campus safety and security systems; (f)  Environmental sustainability projects, including energy efficiency initiatives; and (g)  Any other campus repairs deemed essential to the improvement of educational facilities at the universities. SECTION 3.  As a condition of receiving the funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act: (a)  Each university shall be responsible for developing and submitting to the board of trustees a comprehensive plan detailing the use of the university's allocated funds, which plan must include, at a minimum, specific timelines for the repair and restoration work and shall be subject to approval by the board of trustees; and (b)  Each university shall provide an annual report to the Legislature outlining the progress made on repairs and restorations funded by Section 1 of this act, including detailed accounting of expenditures and any project delays or challenges. SECTION 4.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.